Utah statutes.
23-19-9.5.   Warrant outstanding or failure to comply with citation -- Person not entitled to license, permit, tag, or certificate.

(1)  A person may not purchase a license, permit, tag, or certificate of registration if:

(a)  there is an outstanding Utah warrant against him for failure to appear in answer to a summons for a violation of:

(i)  a provision of this title; or

(ii)  a rule, proclamation, or order of the Wildlife Board; or

(b)  he has failed to comply with a wildlife citation in a state which is a party to the Wildlife Violator Compact set forth in Title 23, Chapter 25.

(2)  The division may allow a person referred to in Subsection (1) to purchase a license, permit, tag, or certificate of registration if satisfactory proof is given that:

(a)  the warrant is no longer outstanding; or

(b)  he has complied with the wildlife citation.

